Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.12.040

Office of student financial assistance to develop and administer program—Agreements authorized.

The office shall develop and administer the state work-study program. The office may create and enter into agreements with employers and eligible institutions to implement this chapter.

[ 2024 c 182 s 2; 2012 c 229 s 520; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 143; 2009 c 560 s 21; 1994 c 130 s 4; 1993 c 385 s 3; 1985 c 370 s 58; 1974 ex.s. c 177 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—Effective date—Disposition of property and funds—Assignment/delegation of contractual rights or duties—2009 c 560: See notes following RCW 18.06.080.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 177: See note following RCW 28B.12.010.

Purpose—1974 ex.s. c 177: See RCW 28B.12.020.